Texas statutes.
PROPERTY CODE

TITLE 5. EXEMPT PROPERTY AND LIENS

SUBTITLE B. LIENS

CHAPTER 51. PROVISIONS GENERALLY APPLICABLE TO LIENS

Sec. 51.0001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Book entry system" means a national book entry system for registering a beneficial interest in a security instrument that acts as a nominee for the grantee, beneficiary, owner, or holder of the security instrument and its successors and assigns.

(2) "Debtor's last known address" means:

(A) for a debt secured by the debtor's residence, the debtor's residence address unless the debtor provided the mortgage servicer a written change of address before the date the mortgage servicer mailed a notice required by Section 51.002; or

(B) for a debt other than a debt described by Paragraph (A), the debtor's last known address as shown by the records of the mortgage servicer of the security instrument unless the debtor provided the current mortgage servicer a written change of address before the date the mortgage servicer mailed a notice required by Section 51.002.

(3) "Mortgage servicer" means the last person to whom a mortgagor has been instructed by the current mortgagee to send payments for the debt secured by a security instrument. A mortgagee may be the mortgage servicer.

(4) "Mortgagee" means:

(A) the grantee, beneficiary, owner, or holder of a security instrument;

(B) a book entry system; or

(C) if the security interest has been assigned of record, the last person to whom the security interest has been assigned of record.

(5) "Mortgagor" means the grantor of a security instrument.

(6) "Security instrument" means a deed of trust, mortgage, or other contract lien on an interest in real property.

(7) "Substitute trustee" means a person appointed by the current mortgagee or mortgage servicer under the terms of the security instrument to exercise the power of sale.

(8) "Trustee" means a person or persons authorized to exercise the power of sale under the terms of a security instrument in accordance with Section 51.0074.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 903 (H.B. 2738), Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.001. EFFECT ON OTHER LIENS. Except as provided by Chapter 59, this subtitle does not affect:

(1) the right to create a lien by special contract or agreement; or

(2) a lien that is not treated in this subtitle, including a lien arising under common law, in equity, or under another statute of this state.

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3525, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984.

Sec. 51.0011. DEFAULT ARISING FROM DELINQUENT AD VALOREM TAXES: INSTALLMENT AGREEMENTS. (a) Notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, a debtor is not in default under a deed of trust or other contract lien on real property used as the debtor's residence for the delinquent payment of ad valorem taxes if:

(1) the debtor gave notice to the mortgage servicer of the intent to enter into an installment agreement with the taxing unit under Section 33.02, Tax Code, for the payment of the taxes at least 10 days before the date the debtor entered into the agreement; and

(2) the property is protected from seizure and sale and a suit may not be filed to collect a delinquent tax on the property as provided by Section 33.02(d), Tax Code.

(b) A mortgage servicer who receives a notice described by Subsection (a)(1) may pay the taxes subject to the installment agreement at any time.

(c) A mortgage servicer who receives a notice described by Subsection (a)(1) and gives the debtor notice that the mortgage servicer intends to accelerate the note securing the deed of trust or other contract lien as a result of the delinquency of the taxes that are subject to the installment agreement must rescind the notice if the debtor enters into the agreement not later than the 30th day after the date the debtor delivers the notice.

Added by Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 1597), Sec. 4, eff. September 1, 2013.

Sec. 51.002. SALE OF REAL PROPERTY UNDER CONTRACT LIEN. (a) Except as provided by Subsection (a-1), a sale of real property under a power of sale conferred by a deed of trust or other contract lien must be a public sale at auction held between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. of the first Tuesday of a month. Except as provided by Subsection (h), the sale must take place at the county courthouse in the county in which the land is located, or if the property is located in more than one county, the sale may be made at the courthouse in any county in which the property is located. The commissioners court shall designate the area at the courthouse where the sales are to take place and shall record the designation in the real property records of the county. The sale must occur in the designated area. If no area is designated by the commissioners court, the notice of sale must designate the area where the sale covered by that notice is to take place, and the sale must occur in that area.

(a-1) If the first Tuesday of a month occurs on January 1 or July 4, a public sale under Subsection (a) must be held between 10 a.m. and 4 p.m. on the first Wednesday of the month.

(b) Except as provided by Subsection (b-1), notice of the sale, which must include a statement of the earliest time at which the sale will begin, must be given at least 21 days before the date of the sale by:

(1) posting at the courthouse door of each county in which the property is located a written notice designating the county in which the property will be sold;

(2) filing in the office of the county clerk of each county in which the property is located a copy of the notice posted under Subdivision (1); and

(3) serving written notice of the sale by certified mail on each debtor who, according to the records of the mortgage servicer of the debt, is obligated to pay the debt.

(b-1) If the courthouse or county clerk's office is closed because of inclement weather, natural disaster, or other act of God, a notice required to be posted at the courthouse under Subsection (b)(1) or filed with the county clerk under Subsection (b)(2) may be posted or filed, as appropriate, up to 48 hours after the courthouse or county clerk's office reopens for business, as applicable.

(c) The sale must begin at the time stated in the notice of sale or not later than three hours after that time.

(d) Notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, the mortgage servicer of the debt shall serve a debtor in default under a deed of trust or other contract lien on real property used as the debtor's residence with written notice by certified mail stating that the debtor is in default under the deed of trust or other contract lien and giving the debtor at least 20 days to cure the default before notice of sale can be given under Subsection (b). The entire calendar day on which the notice required by this subsection is given, regardless of the time of day at which the notice is given, is included in computing the 20-day notice period required by this subsection, and the entire calendar day on which notice of sale is given under Subsection (b) is excluded in computing the 20-day notice period.

(e) Service of a notice under this section by certified mail is complete when the notice is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the debtor at the debtor's last known address. The affidavit of a person knowledgeable of the facts to the effect that service was completed is prima facie evidence of service.

(f) Each county clerk shall keep all notices filed under Subdivision (2) of Subsection (b) in a convenient file that is available to the public for examination during normal business hours. The clerk may dispose of the notices after the date of sale specified in the notice has passed. The clerk shall receive a fee of $2 for each notice filed.

(f-1) A county shall prominently post a notice of sale filed with the county clerk under Subsection (b)(2) on the county's Internet website on a page where the county posts other auction information and that is publicly available for viewing without charge or registration. Along with each notice of sale posted under this subsection, the county must post the date, time, and location of the sale on the same website page on which the notice is posted.

(g) The entire calendar day on which the notice of sale is given, regardless of the time of day at which the notice is given, is included in computing the 21-day notice period required by Subsection (b), and the entire calendar day of the foreclosure sale is excluded.

(h) For the purposes of Subsection (a), the commissioners court of a county may designate an area other than an area at the county courthouse where public sales of real property under this section will take place that is in a public place within a reasonable proximity of the county courthouse as determined by the commissioners court and in a location as accessible to the public as the courthouse door. The commissioners court shall record that designation in the real property records of the county. A designation by a commissioners court under this section is not a ground for challenging or invalidating any sale. A sale must be held at an area designated under this subsection if the sale is held on or after the 90th day after the date the designation is recorded. The posting of the notice required by Subsection (b)(1) of a sale designated under this subsection to take place at an area other than an area of the courthouse remains at the courthouse door of the appropriate county.

(i) Notice served on a debtor under this section must state the name and address of the sender of the notice and contain, in addition to any other statements required under this section, a statement that is conspicuous, printed in boldface or underlined type, and substantially similar to the following: "Assert and protect your rights as a member of the armed forces of the United States. If you are or your spouse is serving on active military duty, including active military duty as a member of the Texas National Guard or the National Guard of another state or as a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, please send written notice of the active duty military service to the sender of this notice immediately."

Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 3525, ch. 576, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1984. Amended by Acts 1984, 68th Leg., 2nd C.S., ch. 18, Sec. 3(b), eff. Oct. 2, 1984; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 540, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1988; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 48, Sec. 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 2, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 533 (H.B. 961), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 555 (H.B. 1235), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 903 (H.B. 2738), Sec. 2, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 252 (H.B. 1127), Sec. 2, eff. January 1, 2012.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 101), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 52 (H.B. 584), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 161 (S.B. 1093), Sec. 17.001, eff. September 1, 2013.

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 642 (H.B. 699), Sec. 2, eff. October 1, 2013.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 133 (H.B. 1128), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2023, 88th Leg., R.S., Ch. 268 (S.B. 62), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2023.

Sec. 51.0021. NOTICE OF CHANGE OF ADDRESS REQUIRED. A debtor shall inform the mortgage servicer of the debt in a reasonable manner of any change of address of the debtor for purposes of providing notice to the debtor under Section 51.002.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 51.0025. ADMINISTRATION OF FORECLOSURE BY MORTGAGE SERVICER. A mortgage servicer may administer the foreclosure of property under Section 51.002 on behalf of a mortgagee if:

(1) the mortgage servicer and the mortgagee have entered into an agreement granting the current mortgage servicer authority to service the mortgage; and

(2) the notices required under Section 51.002(b) disclose that the mortgage servicer is representing the mortgagee under a servicing agreement with the mortgagee and the name of the mortgagee and:

(A) the address of the mortgagee; or

(B) the address of the mortgage servicer, if there is an agreement granting a mortgage servicer the authority to service the mortgage.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 555 (H.B. 1235), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2005.

Sec. 51.003. DEFICIENCY JUDGMENT. (a) If the price at which real property is sold at a foreclosure sale under Section 51.002 is less than the unpaid balance of the indebtedness secured by the real property, resulting in a deficiency, any action brought to recover the deficiency must be brought within two years of the foreclosure sale and is governed by this section.

(b) Any person against whom such a recovery is sought by motion may request that the court in which the action is pending determine the fair market value of the real property as of the date of the foreclosure sale. The fair market value shall be determined by the finder of fact after the introduction by the parties of competent evidence of the value. Competent evidence of value may include, but is not limited to, the following: (1) expert opinion testimony; (2) comparable sales; (3) anticipated marketing time and holding costs; (4) cost of sale; and (5) the necessity and amount of any discount to be applied to the future sales price or the cashflow generated by the property to arrive at a current fair market value.

(c) If the court determines that the fair market value is greater than the sale price of the real property at the foreclosure sale, the persons against whom recovery of the deficiency is sought are entitled to an offset against the deficiency in the amount by which the fair market value, less the amount of any claim, indebtedness, or obligation of any kind that is secured by a lien or encumbrance on the real property that was not extinguished by the foreclosure, exceeds the sale price. If no party requests the determination of fair market value or if such a request is made and no competent evidence of fair market value is introduced, the sale price at the foreclosure sale shall be used to compute the deficiency.

(d) Any money received by a lender from a private mortgage guaranty insurer shall be credited to the account of the borrower prior to the lender bringing an action at law for any deficiency owed by the borrower. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the credit required by this subsection shall not apply to the exercise by a private mortgage guaranty insurer of its subrogation rights against a borrower or other person liable for any deficiency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 12, Sec. 1, eff. April 1, 1991.

Sec. 51.004. JUDICIAL FORECLOSURE--DEFICIENCY. (a) This section applies if:

(1) real property subject to a deed of trust or other contract lien is sold at a foreclosure sale under a court judgment foreclosing the lien and ordering the sale; and

(2) the price at which the real property is sold is less than the unpaid balance of the indebtedness secured by the real property, resulting in a deficiency.

(b) Any person obligated on the indebtedness, including a guarantor, may bring an action in the district court in the county in which the real property is located for a determination of the fair market value of the real property as of the date of the foreclosure sale. The suit must be brought not later than the 90th day after the date of the foreclosure sale unless the suit is brought by a guarantor who did not receive actual notice of the sale before the date of sale, in which case the suit must be brought by the guarantor not later than the 90th day after the date the guarantor received actual notice of the sale. The fair market value shall be determined by the finder of fact after the introduction by the parties of competent evidence of the value. Competent evidence of value may include:

(1) expert opinion testimony;

(2) comparable sales;

(3) anticipated marketing time and holding costs;

(4) cost of sale; and

(5) the necessity and amount of any discount to be applied to the future sales price or the cash flow generated by the property to arrive at a fair market value as of the date of the foreclosure sale.

(c) If the finder of fact determines that the fair market value is greater than the sale price of the real property at the foreclosure sale, the persons obligated on the indebtedness, including guarantors, are entitled to an offset against the deficiency in the amount by which the fair market value, less the amount of any claim, indebtedness, or obligation of any kind that is secured by a lien or encumbrance on the real property that was not extinguished by the foreclosure, exceeds the sale price. If no competent evidence of fair market value is introduced, the sale price at the foreclosure sale shall be used to compute the deficiency.

(d) Any money received by a lender from a private mortgage guaranty insurer shall be credited to the account of the borrower before the lender brings an action at law for any deficiency owed by the borrower. However, the credit required by this subsection does not apply to the exercise by a private mortgage guaranty insurer of its subrogation rights against a borrower or other person liable for any deficiency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 361, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1991.

Sec. 51.005. JUDICIAL OR NONJUDICIAL FORECLOSURE AFTER JUDGMENT AGAINST GUARANTOR--DEFICIENCY. (a) This section applies if:

(1) the holder of a debt obtains a court judgment against a guarantor of the debt;

(2) real property subject to a deed of trust or other contract lien securing the guaranteed debt is sold at a foreclosure sale under Section 51.002 or under a court judgment foreclosing the lien and ordering the sale;

(3) the price at which the real property is sold is less than the unpaid balance of the indebtedness secured by the real property, resulting in a deficiency; and

(4) a motion or suit to determine the fair market value of the real property as of the date of the foreclosure sale has not been filed under Section 51.003 or 51.004.

(b) The guarantor may bring an action in the district court in the county in which the real property is located for a determination of the fair market value of the real property as of the date of the foreclosure sale. The suit must be brought not later than the 90th day after the date of the foreclosure sale or the date the guarantor receives actual notice of the foreclosure sale, whichever is later. The fair market value shall be determined by the finder of fact after the introduction by the parties of competent evidence of the value. Competent evidence of value may include:

(1) expert opinion testimony;

(2) comparable sales;

(3) anticipated marketing time and holding costs;

(4) cost of sale; and

(5) the necessity and amount of any discount to be applied to the future sales price or the cash flow generated by the property to arrive at a fair market value as of the date of the foreclosure sale.

(c) If the finder of fact determines that the fair market value is greater than the sale price of the real property at the foreclosure sale, the persons obligated on the indebtedness, including guarantors, are entitled to an offset against the deficiency in the amount by which the fair market value, less the amount of any claim, indebtedness, or obligation of any kind that is secured by a lien or encumbrance on the real property that was not extinguished by the foreclosure, exceeds the sale price. If no competent evidence of fair market value is introduced, the sale price at the foreclosure sale shall be used to compute the deficiency.

(d) Any money received by a lender from a private mortgage guaranty insurer shall be credited to the account of the borrower before the lender brings an action at law for any deficiency owed by the borrower. However, the credit required by this subsection does not apply to the exercise by a private mortgage guaranty insurer of its subrogation rights against a borrower or other person liable for any deficiency.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 361, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1991.

Sec. 51.006. DEED-OF-TRUST FORECLOSURE AFTER DEED IN LIEU OF FORECLOSURE. (a) This section applies to a holder of a debt under a deed of trust who accepts from the debtor a deed conveying real property subject to the deed of trust in satisfaction of the debt.

(b) The holder of a debt may void a deed conveying real property in satisfaction of the debt before the fourth anniversary of the date the deed is executed and foreclosed under the original deed of trust if:

(1) the debtor fails to disclose to the holder of the debt a lien or other encumbrance on the property before executing the deed conveying the property to the holder of the debt in satisfaction of the debt; and

(2) the holder of the debt has no personal knowledge of the undisclosed lien or encumbrance on the property.

(c) A third party may conclusively rely upon the affidavit of the holder of a debt stating that the holder has voided the deed as provided in this section.

(d) If the holder elects to void a deed in lieu of foreclosure as provided in this section, the priority of its deed of trust shall not be affected or impaired by the execution of the deed in lieu of foreclosure.

(e) If a holder accepts a deed in lieu of foreclosure, the holder may foreclose its deed of trust as provided in said deed of trust without electing to void the deed. The priority of such deed of trust shall not be affected or impaired by the deed in lieu of foreclosure.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 1020, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1995.

Sec. 51.007. TRUSTEE UNDER DEED OF TRUST, CONTRACT LIEN OR SECURITY INSTRUMENT. (a) The trustee named in a suit or proceeding may plead in the answer that the trustee is not a necessary party by a verified denial stating the basis for the trustee's reasonable belief that the trustee was named as a party solely in the capacity as a trustee under a deed of trust, contract lien, or security instrument.

(b) Within 30 days after the filing of the trustee's verified denial, a verified response is due from all parties to the suit or proceeding setting forth all matters, whether in law or fact, that rebut the trustee's verified denial.

(c) If a party has no objection or fails to file a timely verified response to the trustee's verified denial, the trustee shall be dismissed from the suit or proceeding without prejudice.

(d) If a respondent files a timely verified response to the trustee's verified denial, the matter shall be set for hearing. The court shall dismiss the trustee from the suit or proceeding without prejudice if the court determines that the trustee is not a necessary party.

(e) A dismissal of the trustee pursuant to Subsections (c) and (d) shall not prejudice a party's right to seek injunctive relief to prevent the trustee from proceeding with a foreclosure sale.

(f) A trustee shall not be liable for any good faith error resulting from reliance on any information in law or fact provided by the mortgagor or mortgagee or their respective attorney, agent, or representative or other third party.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1304, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999.

Sec. 51.0074. DUTIES OF TRUSTEE. (a) One or more persons may be authorized to exercise the power of sale under a security instrument.

(b) A trustee may not be:

(1) assigned a duty under a security instrument other than to exercise the power of sale in accordance with the terms of the security instrument; or

(2) held to the obligations of a fiduciary of the mortgagor or mortgagee.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 903 (H.B. 2738), Sec. 3, eff. June 15, 2007.

Sec. 51.0075. AUTHORITY OF TRUSTEE OR SUBSTITUTE TRUSTEE. (a) A trustee or substitute trustee may set reasonable conditions for conducting the public sale if the conditions are announced before bidding is opened for the first sale of the day held by the trustee or substitute trustee.

(b) A trustee or substitute trustee is not a debt collector.

(c) Notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, a mortgagee may appoint or may authorize a mortgage servicer to appoint a substitute trustee or substitute trustees to succeed to all title, powers, and duties of the original trustee. A mortgagee or mortgage servicer may make an appointment or authorization under this subsection by power of attorney, corporate resolution, or other written instrument.

(d) A mortgage servicer may authorize an attorney to appoint a substitute trustee or substitute trustees on behalf of a mortgagee under Subsection (c).

(e) The name and a street address for a trustee or substitute trustees shall be disclosed on the notice required by Section 51.002(b).

(f) The purchase price in a sale held by a trustee or substitute trustee under this section is due and payable without delay on acceptance of the bid or within such reasonable time as may be agreed upon by the purchaser and the trustee or substitute trustee if the purchaser makes such request for additional time to deliver the purchase price. The trustee or substitute trustee shall disburse the proceeds of the sale as provided by law.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1231 (H.B. 1234), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2005.

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 903 (H.B. 2738), Sec. 4, eff. June 15, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 323 (H.B. 655), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 51.0076. EFFECTIVE DATE OF APPOINTMENT. The appointment or authorization of a trustee or substitute trustee made in a notice of sale is effective as of the date of the notice if the notice:

(1) complies with Sections 51.002 and 51.0075(e);

(2) is signed by an attorney or agent of the mortgagee or mortgage servicer; and

(3) contains a statement in all capital letters, boldface type, to read as follows:

THIS INSTRUMENT APPOINTS THE SUBSTITUTE TRUSTEE(S) IDENTIFIED TO SELL THE PROPERTY DESCRIBED IN THE SECURITY INSTRUMENT IDENTIFIED IN THIS NOTICE OF SALE THE PERSON SIGNING THIS NOTICE IS THE ATTORNEY OR AUTHORIZED AGENT OF THE MORTGAGEE OR MORTGAGE SERVICER.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 653 (H.B. 2063), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Sec. 51.008. CERTAIN LIENS ON REAL PROPERTY. (a) A lien on real property created under this code or another law of this state in favor of a governmental entity must be recorded as provided by Chapters 11 and 12 in the real property records of the county in which the property or a portion of the property is located unless:

(1) the lien is imposed as a result of failure to pay:

(A) ad valorem taxes; or

(B) a penalty or interest owed in connection with those taxes; or

(2) the law establishing the lien expressly states that recording the lien is not required.

(b) Any notice of the lien required by law must contain a legal description of the property.

(c) This section does not apply to:

(1) a lien created under Section 89.083, Natural Resources Code;

(2) a state tax lien under Chapter 113, Tax Code; or

(3) a lien established under Chapter 61 or 213, Labor Code.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 827, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 51.009. FORECLOSED PROPERTY SOLD "AS IS". A purchaser at a sale of real property under Section 51.002:

(1) acquires the foreclosed property "as is" without any expressed or implied warranties, except as to warranties of title, and at the purchaser's own risk; and

(2) is not a consumer.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 554, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Sec. 51.015. SALE OF CERTAIN PROPERTY OWNED BY MEMBER OF THE MILITARY. (a) In this section:

(1) "Active duty military service" means:

(A) service as a member of the armed forces of the United States; and

(B) with respect to a member of the Texas National Guard or the National Guard of another state or a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States, active duty under an order of the president of the United States.

(1-a) "Assessment" and "assessments" have the meanings assigned by Sections 82.113(a) and 209.002, as applicable.

(2) "Dwelling" means a residential structure or manufactured home that contains one to four family housing units.

(3) "Military servicemember" means:

(A) a member of the armed forces of the United States;

(B) a member of the Texas National Guard or the National Guard of another state serving on active duty under an order of the president of the United States; or

(C) a member of a reserve component of the armed forces of the United States who is on active duty under an order of the president of the United States.

(4) "Person" has the meaning assigned by Section 311.005, Government Code.

(b) This section applies only to an obligation:

(1) that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other contract lien, including a lien securing payment of an assessment or assessments, as applicable, on real property or personal property that is a dwelling owned by a military servicemember;

(2) that originates before the date on which the servicemember's active duty military service commences; and

(3) for which the servicemember is still obligated.

(c) In an action filed during a military servicemember's period of active duty military service or during the nine months after the date on which that service period concludes to foreclose a lien or otherwise enforce an obligation described by Subsection (b), the court may after a hearing and on the court's own motion, and shall on the application by a servicemember whose ability to comply with the obligations of the contract secured by the lien is materially affected by the servicemember's military service:

(1) stay the proceedings for a period of time as justice and equity require; or

(2) adjust the obligations of the contract secured by the lien to preserve the interests of all parties.

(d) A sale, foreclosure, or seizure of property under a mortgage, deed of trust, or other contract lien described by Subsection (b) may not be conducted during the military servicemember's period of active duty military service or during the nine months after the date on which that service period concludes unless the sale, foreclosure, or seizure is conducted under:

(1) a court order issued before the sale, foreclosure, or seizure; or

(2) an agreement that complies with Subsection (e).

(e) A military servicemember may waive the servicemember's rights under this section only as provided by this subsection. The waiver must be:

(1) in writing in at least 12-point type;

(2) executed as an instrument separate from the obligation to which the waiver applies; and

(3) made under a written agreement:

(A) executed during or after the servicemember's period of active duty military service; and

(B) specifying the legal instrument to which the waiver applies and, if the servicemember is not a party to the instrument, the servicemember concerned.

(f) A person commits an offense if the person knowingly makes or causes to be made a sale, foreclosure, or seizure of property that is prohibited by Subsection (d). An offense under this subsection is a Class A misdemeanor.

(g) On application to a court, a dependent of a military servicemember is entitled to the protections of this section if the dependent's ability to comply with an obligation that is secured by a mortgage, deed of trust, or other contract lien on real property or personal property that is a dwelling is materially affected by the servicemember's military service.

(h) A court that issues a stay or takes any other action under this section regarding the enforcement of an obligation that is subject to this section may grant a similar stay or take similar action with respect to a surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, comaker, or other person who is or may be primarily or secondarily subject to the obligation.

(i) If a judgment or decree is vacated or set aside wholly or partly under this section, the court may also set aside or vacate, as applicable, the judgment or decree with respect to a surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, comaker, or other person who is or may be primarily or secondarily subject to the obligation that is subject to the judgment or decree.

(j) This section does not prevent a waiver in writing by a surety, guarantor, endorser, accommodation maker, comaker, or other person, whether primarily or secondarily liable on an obligation, of the protections provided under Subsections (h) and (i). A waiver described by this subsection is effective only if it is executed as an instrument separate from the obligation with respect to which it applies. If a waiver under this subsection is executed by an individual who after the execution of the waiver enters active duty military service, or by a dependent of an individual who after the execution of the waiver enters active duty military service, the waiver is not valid after the beginning of the period of the active duty military service unless the waiver was executed by the individual or dependent during the applicable period described by 50 U.S.C. App. Section 516, as that section existed on January 1, 2009.

Added by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 992 (H.B. 3857), Sec. 1, eff. June 19, 2009.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 101), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 592 (S.B. 101), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2011.

Sec. 51.016. RESCISSION OF NONJUDICIAL FORECLOSURE SALES. (a) This section applies only to a nonjudicial foreclosure sale of residential real property conducted under Section 51.002. In this subsection, "residential real property" means:

(1) a single family home, duplex, triplex, or quadraplex; or

(2) a unit in a multiunit residential structure in which title to an individual unit is transferred to the owner of the unit under a condominium or cooperative system.

(b) Not later than the 15th calendar day after the date of a foreclosure sale, a mortgagee, trustee, or substitute trustee may rescind the sale under this section if:

(1) the statutory requirements for the sale were not satisfied;

(2) the default leading to the sale was cured before the sale;

(3) a receivership or dependent probate administration involving the property was pending at the time of sale;

(4) a condition specified in the conditions of sale prescribed by the trustee or substitute trustee before the sale and made available in writing to prospective bidders at the sale was not met;

(5) the mortgagee or mortgage servicer and the debtor agreed before the sale to cancel the sale based on an enforceable written agreement by the debtor to cure the default; or

(6) at the time of the sale, a court-ordered or automatic stay of the sale imposed in a bankruptcy case filed by a person with an interest in the property was in effect.

(c) On or before the 15th calendar day after the date of the sale, the party rescinding the sale shall:

(1) serve a written notice of rescission that describes the reason for the rescission and includes recording information for any affected trustee's or substitute trustee's deed that was recorded on:

(A) the purchaser, if the mortgagee is not the purchaser; and

(B) each debtor who, according to the records of the mortgage servicer of the debt, is obligated to pay the debt; and

(2) file each notice for recording in the real property records of the county in which all or a part of the property is located.

(d) A notice required by Subsection (c) must be served by certified mail. Service of the notice is complete when the notice is deposited in the United States mail, postage prepaid and addressed to the purchaser or debtor, as applicable, at the purchaser's or debtor's last known address, as applicable. The affidavit of a person knowledgeable of the facts to the effect that service was completed is prima facie evidence of service.

(e) Not later than the fifth calendar day after the date a foreclosure sale is rescinded under this section, the mortgagee shall return to the purchaser by certified mail, electronic or wire transfer, or courier service with delivery tracking the amount of the bid paid by the purchaser for the property at the sale. The debtor shall return to the trustee the amount of any excess proceeds received by the debtor from the sale. The return of the bid amount is considered made on the date:

(1) the bid amount is deposited postage prepaid in the United States mail or with the courier service addressed to the purchaser at the purchaser's last known address; or

(2) the electronic or wire transfer is ordered.

(f) The rescinding mortgagee, trustee, or substitute trustee shall cause to be filed for recording in the real property records of the county where the notice required under Subsection (c) was recorded an affidavit stating the date the bid amount was returned together with the certified mail, electronic or wire transfer, or courier service delivery tracking information.

(g) An affidavit executed and filed in accordance with Subsection (f) is prima facie evidence of the return of the bid amount and of the authority of the maker of the affidavit. A bona fide purchaser, lender, or other person acquiring an interest in the property or an insurer of title is entitled to rely conclusively on the record of the filed affidavit and notice, and any subsequent purchaser in good faith and for value is entitled to bona fide purchaser protection.

(h) The rescission of a foreclosure sale under this section restores the mortgagee and the debtor to their respective title, rights, and obligations under any instrument relating to the foreclosed property that existed immediately prior to the sale.

(i) A rescission of a foreclosure sale under this section is void as to a creditor or to a subsequent purchaser for a valuable consideration without notice unless notice of the rescission has been acknowledged, sworn to, or proved and filed for recording as required by law. A rescission of a foreclosure sale under this section evidenced by an unrecorded instrument is binding on a party to the instrument, on the party's heirs, and on a subsequent purchaser who does not pay a valuable consideration or who has notice of the instrument.

(j) No action challenging the effectiveness of a rescission under this section may be commenced unless the action is filed on or before the 30th calendar day after the date the notices of rescission required by Subsection (c) are filed for recording. A lis pendens notice based on the rescission not recorded within that period has no effect. This subsection does not affect the limitations period for an action claiming damages resulting from the rescission.

(k) If the foreclosure sale is rescinded under this section for a reason listed in Subsection (b), other than a stay described by Subsection (b)(6), the court in a civil action filed by the purchaser challenging the effectiveness of the rescission or claiming damages resulting from the rescission may only award as damages to the purchaser the amount of the bid paid for the property by the purchaser at the sale that has not been refunded to the purchaser, plus interest on that amount at the rate of 10 percent per year. Notwithstanding any other law, the court may not order specific performance of the sale as a remedy for the purchaser. Interest awarded under this subsection ceases to accrue on the fourth day after the date the mortgagee deposits the amount of the damages awarded in the United States mail or with a courier for delivery to the purchaser.

(l) If a foreclosure sale is rescinded under this section for a reason provided by Subsection (b)(6), the court in a civil action filed by the purchaser challenging the effectiveness of the rescission or claiming damages resulting from the rescission may only award as damages to the purchaser the amount of the bid paid for the property by the purchaser at the sale that has not been refunded to the purchaser.

(m) Nothing in this section prohibits the rescission of a sale by agreement of the affected parties on other terms or a suit to rescind a sale not rescinded under this section.

Added by Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 551 (H.B. 2066), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2015.